Utah statutes.
73-4-5.   Statements by claimants.
Each person claiming a right to use any water of such river system or water
source shall, within 90 days after the completed service of the notice of
completion of survey prescribed by Section 73-4-3 hereof, file in the office
of the clerk of the district court a statement in writing which shall be
signed and verified by the oath of the claimant, and shall include as near as
may be the following: The name and post-office address of the person making
the claim; the nature of the use on which the claim of appropriation is based;
the flow of water used in cubic feet per second or the quantity of water
stored in acre-feet, and the time during which it has been used each year; the
name of the stream or other source from which the water is diverted, the point
on such stream or source where the water is diverted, and the nature of the
diverting works; the date when the first work for diverting the water was
begun, and the nature of such work; the date when the water was first used,
the flow in cubic feet per second or the quantity of water stored in acre-
feet, and the time during which the water was used the first year; and the
place and manner of present use; and such other facts as will clearly define
the extent and nature of the appropriation claimed, or as may be required by
the blank form which shall be furnished by the state engineer under the
direction of the court.
